Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-726
Information; access.

Except as provided in this section and sections 28-722 and 81-3126, no person, official, or agency shall have access to information in the tracking system of child protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-715 or in records in the central registry of child protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718 unless in furtherance of purposes directly connected with the administration of the Child Protection and Family Safety Act. Such persons, officials, and agencies having access to such information shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) A law enforcement agency investigating a report of known or suspected child abuse or neglect;

(2) A county attorney in preparation of a child abuse or neglect petition or termination of parental rights petition;

(3) A physician who has before him or her a child whom he or she reasonably suspects may be abused or neglected;

(4) An agency having the legal responsibility or authorization to care for, treat, or supervise an abused or neglected child or a parent, a guardian, or other person responsible for the abused or neglected child's welfare who is the subject of the report of child abuse or neglect;

(5) Any person engaged in bona fide research or auditing. No information identifying the subjects of the report of child abuse or neglect shall be made available to the researcher or auditor;

(6) The Foster Care Review Office and the designated local foster care review board when the information relates to a child in a foster care placement as defined in section 43-1301. The information provided to the office and local board shall not include the name or identity of any person making a report of suspected child abuse or neglect;

(7) The designated protection and advocacy system authorized pursuant to the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, 42 U.S.C. 15001, as the act existed on January 1, 2005, and the Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals Act, 42 U.S.C. 10801, as the act existed on September 1, 2001, acting upon a complaint received from or on behalf of a person with developmental disabilities or mental illness;

(8) The person or persons having custody of the abused or neglected child in situations of alleged out-of-home child abuse or neglect;

(9) The department, as required or authorized by state law, federal law, federal regulation, or applicable federal program provisions and in furtherance of its programs;

(10) A probation officer administering juvenile intake services pursuant to section 29-2260.01, conducting court-ordered predispositional investigations prior to disposition, or supervising a juvenile upon disposition; and

(11) A child advocacy center pursuant to team protocols and in connection with a specific case under review or investigation by a child abuse and neglect investigation team or a child abuse and neglect treatment team convened by a county attorney.

Laws 1979, LB 505, § 14;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 47;

Laws 1990, LB 1222, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 643, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1035, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 119, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 214, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 642, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 39;

Laws 2008, LB782, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 16;

Laws 2020, LB1148, § 5.